Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-103.49
Ready-to-drink cocktail, defined.

Ready-to-drink cocktail means a beverage or confection containing spirits in an original package which contains twelve and one-half percent or less alcohol by volume.

Laws 2021, LB274, § 4.